Nevada, session 83, AB422.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 413 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An employee who is a volunteer member of the Nevada
Wing of the Civil Air Patrol is entitled to a leave of absence from
his or her employment without loss of position, seniority, accrued
leave or benefits on all days during which the employee is:
(a) Engaged in training for emergency missions with the Civil
Air Patrol, not to exceed 10 workdays during each federal fiscal
year; or
(b) Responding to an emergency mission as a Civil Air Patrol
volunteer, not to exceed 30 workdays during each federal fiscal
year.
2. An employee requesting leave pursuant to this section shall
provide to his or her employer:
(a) Certification that the employee has been authorized by the
United States Air Force, the Governor or a political subdivision of
this State to respond to or train for an emergency mission; and
(b) Verification from the Civil Air Patrol of the emergency
need of the volunteer service of the employee.
3. An employer may treat a leave of absence pursuant to this
section as unpaid leave. An employer shall not require an
employee to exhaust any other leave to which the employee is
entitled before such a leave of absence pursuant to this section.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an employer
from providing paid leave during such leaves of absence.
4. Any employee aggrieved by a violation of this section may
bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against
any person who commits the violation to seek any or all of the
following relief:
(a) Damages equal to the amount of the lost wages and
benefits; and
(b) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
5. As used in this section, “emergency mission” includes,
without limitation, search and rescue and disaster response
activities.
Sec. 2. NRS 414.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.250 1. An employee who wishes to join a volunteer
search and rescue or reserve unit of a sheriff’s department or join a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Civil Air Patrol unit as a volunteer member shall disclose that fact
to his or her employer.
2. [If] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act, if
the employer chooses not to allow the employee to participate in
[search and rescue] the activities of such a reserve unit or Civil Air
Patrol unit during his or her normal working hours, the employer
shall notify the employee as soon as practicable after the disclosure
is made pursuant to subsection 1.
3. An applicant for employment who is a member of a search
and rescue or reserve unit of a sheriff’s department or a Civil Air
Patrol unit shall disclose that fact to his or her prospective employer.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)